Arkansas, session 2025, HB1570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-15-306 is amended to read as follows:
14-15-306. Disposition of prescription medication narcotic drugs.
(a)(1) A coroner may shall collect and secure any prescription
medication narcotic drug of the decedent to ensure that the medication does
not come into the possession of a person who might use the medication in an
illegal or harmful manner.
(2) A law enforcement officer may collect and secure any
narcotic drug of the decedent to ensure that the medication does not come
into the possession of a person who might use the medication in an illegal or
harmful manner.
(b) Collected medication narcotic drugs shall be disposed of under
circuit court order or shall be forwarded to the Department of Health within
thirty (30) days for proper destruction under § 20-64-214.
(c) This section shall not apply to any prescription medication in the
custody or possession of an institutional healthcare provider or attending
hospice nurse that is subject to other laws, rules, and regulations governing
the destruction or disposition of patient or resident medication.
*SSS132*
02/24/2025 3:29:50 PM SSS132

HB1570
(d) As used in this section, "narcotic drug" means the same as defined
in § 20-64-201.


































02/24/2025 3:29:50 PM SSS132